en-cni.base.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
    <alphabet>abcdefghijklmnñopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNÑOPQRSTUVWXYZ</alphabet>
    <sdefs>
        <sdef n="mi"     c="Morphological information"/>
        <sdef n="parol"  c="PAROLE style tag"/>
        <sdef n="si"    c="syntactic information"/>
        <sdef n="lem"    c="lem"/>
        <sdef n="auxlem"    c="auxiliary lemma"/>
        <sdef n="auxverbmi"    c="auxiliary morphology"/>
        <sdef n="addlem"    c="addlem"/>
        <sdef n="adpos"    c="adpositions (pre- or postpositions)"/>
        <!--    deprecated <sdef n="split"    c="1:n translation that need to be split up (-> 2,3.. nodes)"/> -->
        <sdef n="root_type"    c="root type"/>
        <sdef n="preform"    c="additional wordform, insert before"/>
        <sdef n="postform"    c="additional wordform, insert after"/>
        <sdef n="firstform"    c="additional wordform, insert as first token"/>
        <sdef n="moveToHead_mi"    c="additional morphology for head"/>
        <sdef n="lemInCpred"    c="additional morphology for Cpred (and make this the head)"/>
        <sdef n="add_mi"    c="additional morphology"/>
        <sdef n="poss"    c="poss"/>
        <sdef n="gndr"    c="gender: +n./m. masculine and not-masculine; +m. masculine; +n.m. not-masculine"/>
        <sdef n="inal"    c="inalienable"/>
        <sdef n="voc"    c="vocative FLAGS +N (None). +1SG, +2SG, +3SG, +1PL, +2PL, +3PL"/>
        <sdef n="num"    c="number +1SG, +2SG, 3SG, 1PL. 2PL, 3PL"/>
        <sdef n="kinship"    c="+m.ego, +n.m.ego"/>
        <sdef n="inf"    c="infinitive: aantsi, antsi, agaantsi"/>
		<sdef n="pragm.func"    c="..."/>
		<sdef n="i-conj"    c="..."/>
		<sdef n="mrph.phon"    c="..."/>
		<sdef n="sem"    c="..."/>
		<sdef n="kin"    c="..."/>
        <!-- Location -->
        <sdef n="loc"    c="location"/>
        <sdef n="verbmi"    c="verbal morphology needed for generation"/>
        <sdef n="subj"    c="for verbs: type (semantic label) or lemma of subject"/>
        <sdef n="obj"    c="for verbs: type (semantic label) or lemma of object"/>
        <sdef n="transitivity"    c="for verbs: either rflx (intransitive or reflexive form with 'se'), rzpr (reciprocal form with 'se'), intrans (intransitive form, no 'se'), trans (transitive form, need a 'cd')"/>
        <sdef n="subjToObj"    c="for verbs: convert subject to object, e.g. 'tengo una casa' -> in Q: wasi kapuWAn"/>
        <sdef n="func"    c="attributive use of nominal root translated from Spanish adjective"/>
        <sdef n="s_pos"    c="source pos (if necessary to distinguish between adj and noun (e.g. 'general'))"/>
        <sdef n="pobjCase"    c="different case of 'prepositional object' in Quechua and Spanish (e.g. 'convertir(se) en/a' -> '-man tukuy' (no -pi))"/>
        <sdef n="objCase"    c="different case of 'direct object' in Spanish"/>
        <sdef n="iobjCase"    c="different case of 'indirect object' in Spanish"/>
        <sdef n="head"    c="use this translation only if head matches indicated semantics"/>
        <!--  -->
        <sdef n="v" c="verb"/>
        <sdef n="n" c="noun"/>
        <sdef n="sg" c="singular"/>
        <sdef n="pl" c="plural"/>
        
        <!-- Classifier -->
        <sdef n="CL:L.S.T.F.F" c="classifier"/>
        <sdef n="CL:long,thin.branch" c="classifier"/>
        <sdef n="add_mi"    c="additional morphology"/>
        <sdef n="preform"    c="additional wordform, insert before"/>
        <!--  -->
        <sdef n="sci.nm."    c="scientific name"/>
		
		<sdef n="compound-only-L" c="May only be the left-side of a compound"/>
		<sdef n="compound-R"      c="May be the right-side of a compound, or a full word"/>
    </sdefs>
    <pardefs>
        <pardef n="cl__n">
            <e><p><l>shi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="CL:L.S.T.F.F"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
            <e><p><l>kii</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="CL:L.S.T.F.F"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="nmz__v">
            <e><p><l>nka</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="Personal_pronoun">
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>PRP</l><r><s n="mi"/>PrnPers</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="Possessive_pronoun">
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>PRP$</l><r><s n="mi"/>PrnPoss</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="Noun">
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>NNS</l><r><s n="mi"/>NRoot+PL</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>NN</l><r><s n="mi"/>NRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>NNP</l><r><s n="mi"/>NRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>NP00000</l><r><s n="mi"/>NRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>NP</l><r><s n="mi"/>NRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>NP00G00</l><r><s n="mi"/>NRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>NP00O00</l><r><s n="mi"/>NRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>NP00V00</l><r><s n="mi"/>NRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>NP00SP0</l><r><s n="mi"/>NRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>NNPS</l><r><s n="mi"/>NRoot+PL</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="Verb">
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>MD</l><r><s n="mi"/>VRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>VBG</l><r><s n="mi"/>VRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>VB</l><r><s n="mi"/>VRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>VBN</l><r><s n="mi"/>VRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>VBD</l><r><s n="mi"/>VRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>VBP</l><r><s n="mi"/>VRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>VBZ</l><r><s n="mi"/>VRoot</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="Adverb">
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>RB</l><r><s n="mi"/>AdvRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>RBR</l><r><s n="mi"/>AdvRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>RBS</l><r><s n="mi"/>AdvRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>WRB</l><r><s n="mi"/>AdvRoot</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="Adjectives">
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>JJ</l><r><s n="mi"/>AdjRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>JJR</l><r><s n="mi"/>AdjRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>JJS</l><r><s n="mi"/>AdjRoot</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="Conjunctions">
            <!-- 
                Tag         Atributes
                CC          pos:conjunction; type:coordinating
            -->
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>CC</l><r><s n="mi"/>ConnRoot</r></p></e>  
        </pardef> 
        <pardef n="Determiner">
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>DT</l><r><s n="mi"/>DetRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>WDT</l><r><s n="mi"/>DetRoot</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>PDT</l><r><s n="mi"/>DetRoot</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="Ideophone">
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>NN</l><r><s n="mi"/>IdeoRoot</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="Particle">
            <e><p><l><s n="parol"/>RP</l><r></r></p></e>
        </pardef>
    </pardefs>

        <e><p><l>he</l><r>irio</r></p><par n="Personal_pronoun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>he</l><r>iryo</r></p><par n="Personal_pronoun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>she</l><r>iro</r></p><par n="Personal_pronoun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>she</l><r>iroo</r></p><par n="Personal_pronoun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>it</l><r>hirova</r></p><par n="Personal_pronoun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>we</l><r>aaka</r></p><par n="Personal_pronoun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>we</l><r>aro</r></p><par n="Personal_pronoun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>boundary</l><r>overapaka</r></p><par n="Noun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>down_river</l><r>kirinka</r></p><par n="Particle"/></e>
        <e><p><l>fellowman</l><r>sheni<s n="add_mi"/>+NMZ</r></p><par n="Noun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>healthy</l><r>oyerini<s n="preform"/>#tekatsi</r></p><par n="Adjectives"/></e>
        <e><p><l>chicken</l><r>tyaapa<s n="poss"/>+te<s n="poss"/>+n.m.</r></p><par n="Noun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>hot_water</l><r>saava<s n="add_mi"/>+CL:liquid@a+ADJ<s n="gndr"/>+m.</r></p><par n="Adjectives"/></e>
        <e><p><l>hot</l><r>saava<s n="add_mi"/>+ADJ<s n="gndr"/>+m.</r></p><par n="Adjectives"/></e>
        <e><p><l>hunter</l><r>komintsare</r></p><par n="Noun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>international</l><r>nampitsi<s n="preform"/>#pashinisato</r></p><par n="Adjectives"/></e>
        <e><p><l>invalid</l><r>inkantahe<s n="preform"/>#te</r></p><par n="Adjectives"/></e>
        <e><p><l>invalid</l><r>maotsaro<s n="gndr"/>+n.m.</r></p><par n="Adjectives"/></e>
        <e><p><l>lesbian</l><r>tsinamparo</r></p><par n="Noun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>long</l><r>santsari<s n="gndr"/>+m.</r></p><par n="Adjectives"/></e>
        <e><p><l>long_pointed_fishing_arrow</l><r>tsantsakire<s n="inal"/>+ntsi</r></p><par n="Noun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>national</l><r>anampisato<s n="gndr"/>+n.m.</r></p><par n="Adjectives"/></e>
        <e><p><l>old</l><r>kinkivaro<s n="gndr"/>+n.m.</r></p><par n="Adjectives"/></e>
        <e><p><l>painted</l><r>karinaro<s n="gndr"/>+n.m.</r></p><par n="Noun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>plate</l><r>oantamento<s n="inal"/>+ntsi</r></p><par n="Noun"/></e>
       <e><p><l>ruler</l><r>yomaare<s n="inal" />+ntsi.</r></p><par n="Noun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>reliable</l><r>tseeyacha<s n="preform"/>#kaari</r></p><par n="Noun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>sex_worker</l><r>ovatsa<s n="preform"/>#tsinane#pimantirori<s n="gndr"/>+n.m.</r></p><par n="Noun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>sharp</l><r>tsaimpiri<s n="gndr"/>+m.</r></p><par n="Adjectives"/></e>
        <e><p><l>singing</l><r>pantsa<s n="inal"/>+ntsi</r></p><par n="Noun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>sleepy</l><r>pochokinti<s n="gndr"/>+m.</r></p><par n="Noun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>small</l><r>iyaani</r></p><par n="Adjectives"/></e>
        <e><p><l>small</l><r>kapichee</r></p><par n="Adjectives"/></e>
        <e><p><l>school</l><r>panko<s n="preform"/>#yotaantsi</r></p><par n="Noun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>stupid</l><r>iotatsine<s n="preform"/>#kaari</r></p><par n="Adjectives"/></e>
        <e><p><l>up_river</l><r>katonko</r></p><par n="Particle"/></e>
        <e><p><l>visible</l><r>konihataantsi</r></p><par n="Adjectives"/></e>
        <e><p><l>wrinkled</l><r>ampitsari<s n="gndr"/>+m.</r></p><par n="Noun"/></e>
        <e><p><l>quickly</l><r>shintsi<s n="add_mi"/>+ADV@ni</r></p><par n="Adverb"/></e>
        <e><p><l>inside</l><r>intsomoe</r></p><par n="Adverb"/></e>
        <e><p><l>alone</l><r>apaniroeni</r></p><par n="Adverb"/></e>
        <e><p><l>alone</l><r>apanironi</r></p><par n="Adverb"/></e>
        <e><p><l>well</l><r>kametsa</r></p><par n="Adverb"/></e>
        <e><p><l>never</l><r>katsini<s n="preform"/>#eiro</r></p><par n="Adverb"/></e>
        <e><p><l>here</l><r>aka<s n="loc"/>+proximal.b.</r></p><par n="Adverb"/></e>
        <e><p><l>here</l><r>haka<s n="loc"/>+proximal.b.</r></p><par n="Adverb"/></e>
        <e><p><l>there</l><r>ara<s n="loc"/>+medial.b.</r></p><par n="Adverb"/></e>
        <e><p><l>there</l><r>hara<s n="loc"/>+medial.b.</r></p><par n="Adverb"/></e>
        <e><p><l>there</l><r>anta<s n="loc"/>+distal.b.</r></p><par n="Adverb"/></e>
        <e><p><l>there</l><r>hanta<s n="loc"/>+distal.b.</r></p><par n="Adverb"/></e>
        <e><p><l>there</l><r>hanto<s n="loc"/>+distal.unb.</r></p><par n="Adverb"/></e>
        <e><p><l>over_there</l><r>hanto<s n="loc"/>+distal.unb.</r></p><par n="Adverb"/></e>
        <e><p><l>but</l><r>irokantaincha</r></p><par n="Conjunctions"/></e>
        <e><p><l>but</l><r>kantaincha<s n="preform"/>#iro</r></p><par n="Conjunctions"/></e>
        <e><p><l>and</l><r>eehatzi</r></p><par n="Conjunctions"/></e>
        <e><p><l>that</l><r>irora</r></p><par n="Determiner"/></e>
        <e><p><l>many</l><r>osheki</r></p><par n="Determiner"/></e>
        <e><p><l>both</l><r>apiteroite</r></p><par n="Determiner"/></e>
